North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11.1 Early Childhood Services
50-11.1-07.
Investigation of applicant, licensee, holder of self-declaration or registration document, and staff members — Inspection of programs and premises — Maintenance of records — Confidentiality of records. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department or its authorized agent at any time may investigate and inspect an early childhood program, or a holder of a self-declaration or registration document and the conditions of their premises, the qualifications of a provider of early childhood services, of current and prospective staff members, of any in-home provider or applicant seeking or holding a license, self-declaration, or registration document under this chapter.

Upon request of the department or its authorized agent, the state department of health or the state fire marshal, or the fire marshal’s designee, shall inspect the premises for which a license, four-year old program approval, or self-declaration is applied or issued and shall report the findings to the department or the department’s authorized agent.

A licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant shall:

Maintain records as the department prescribes regarding each child in the licensee’s, holder’s, or registrant’s care and control, and shall report to the department or the department’s authorized agent, when requested, upon forms furnished by the department, facts the department may require with reference to each child;

Admit for inspection the department or the department’s authorized agent and open for examination all records, books, and reports; and

Notify the parent of each child receiving early childhood services and all staff members of the process for reporting a complaint or a suspected licensing violation.

Except as provided in subsection 5, all records and information maintained with respect to any child receiving early childhood services are confidential and must be properly safeguarded and may not be disclosed except:

In a judicial proceeding;

To officers of the law or other legally constituted boards or agencies; or

To persons having a definite interest in the well-being of the child concerned and who, in the judgment of the department, are in a position to serve the child’s interests should that be necessary.

A provider of early childhood services, upon the request of the parent of a child for whom the provider provides such services, shall make available to the parent a list of the names, telephone numbers, and addresses of the parents of children for whom early childhood services are provided. The list may include only the names, telephone numbers, electronic mail addresses, and addresses of parents who grant the provider permission to disclose that information.

The following information for early childhood services licensees, self-declarations, in-home providers, staff members, and adults residing in a home out of which early childhood services are provided is not confidential:

Name;

Address;

Telephone number; and

Electronic mail address.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 7; 1979, ch. 509, § 6; 1981, ch. 491, § 6; 1985, ch. 526, § 7; 1991, ch. 511, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 416, § 1; 2005, ch. 418, § 9; 2009, ch. 422, § 12; 2021, ch. 358, § 5, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 422, effective September 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-07 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 358, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1416; and Section 422 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

50-11.1-07.
Investigation of applicant, licensee, holder of self-declaration or registration document, and staff members — Inspection of programs and premises — Maintenance of records — Confidentiality of records. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department or its authorized agent at any time may investigate and inspect an early childhood program, or a holder of a self-declaration or registration document and the conditions of their premises, the qualifications of a provider of early childhood services, of current and prospective staff members, of any in-home provider or applicant seeking or holding a license, self-declaration, or registration document under this chapter.

Upon request of the department or its authorized agent, the state fire marshal, or the fire marshal’s designee, shall inspect the premises for which a license, four-year old program approval, or self-declaration is applied or issued and shall report the findings to the department or the department’s authorized agent.

A licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant shall:

Maintain records as the department prescribes regarding each child in the licensee’s, holder’s, or registrant’s care and control, and shall report to the department or the department’s authorized agent, when requested, upon forms furnished by the department, facts the department may require with reference to each child;

Admit for inspection the department or the department’s authorized agent and open for examination all records, books, and reports; and

Notify the parent of each child receiving early childhood services and all staff members of the process for reporting a complaint or a suspected licensing violation.

Except as provided in subsection 5, all records and information maintained with respect to any child receiving early childhood services are confidential and must be properly safeguarded and may not be disclosed except:

In a judicial proceeding;

To officers of the law or other legally constituted boards or agencies; or

To persons having a definite interest in the well-being of the child concerned and who, in the judgment of the department, are in a position to serve the child’s interests should that be necessary.

A provider of early childhood services, upon the request of the parent of a child for whom the provider provides such services, shall make available to the parent a list of the names, telephone numbers, and addresses of the parents of children for whom early childhood services are provided. The list may include only the names, telephone numbers, electronic mail addresses, and addresses of parents who grant the provider permission to disclose that information.

The following information for early childhood services licensees, self-declarations, in-home providers, staff members, and adults residing in a home out of which early childhood services are provided is not confidential:

Name;

Address;

Telephone number; and

Electronic mail address.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 7; 1979, ch. 509, § 6; 1981, ch. 491, § 6; 1985, ch. 526, § 7; 1991, ch. 511, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 416, § 1; 2005, ch. 418, § 9; 2009, ch. 422, § 12; 2021, ch. 358, § 5, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 422, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11.1-07.1.
Notice.

After each inspection or reinspection, the department or the department’s authorized agent, by certified mail, shall send copies of any correction order or notice of noncompliance, to the early childhood program or holder of a self-declaration.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 12; 1985, ch. 526, § 8; 2005, ch. 418, § 10; 2009, ch. 422, § 13.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.2.
Correction orders.

If the department or the department’s authorized agent finds, upon inspection, the program, self-declaration, or premises is not in compliance with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the department or the department’s authorized agent may issue a correction order to the program or self-declaration, provided the department does not revoke the license or self-declaration as a result of the noncompliance. The correction order must cite the specific statute or rule violated, state the factual basis of the violation, state the suggested method of correction, and specify the time allowed for correction. The correction order must also specify the amount of any fiscal sanction to be assessed if the program or self-declaration fails to comply with the correction order in a timely fashion. This section does not apply to an applicant’s failure to comply with subsection 8 of section 50-11.1-03 or subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 50-11.1-16.

Within three business days of the receipt of the correction order, the licensee of the early childhood program or the holder of a self-declaration shall notify the parent of each child receiving early childhood services that a correction order has been issued. In addition to providing notice to the parent of each child, the licensee or holder of a self-declaration shall post the correction order in a conspicuous location upon the early childhood premises until the violation has been corrected or for five days, whichever is longer.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 13; 1985, ch. 526, § 9; 2003, ch. 416, § 2; 2005, ch. 418, § 11; 2009, ch. 422, § 14; 2017, ch. 348, § 8, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 406, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.3.
Reinspections.

The department or the department’s authorized agent shall reinspect or review an early childhood program or holder of a self-declaration that was issued a correction order under section 50-11.1-07.2, at the end of the period allowed for correction. If, upon reinspection or review, the department determines the program or holder of a self-declaration has not corrected a violation identified in the correction order, the department shall mail to the program or the holder of a self-declaration, by certified mail, a notice of noncompliance with the correction order. The notice must specify the violations not corrected and the penalties assessed in accordance with section 50-11.1-07.5.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 14; 1985, ch. 526, § 10; 2009, ch. 422, § 15; 2019, ch. 406, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 15 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.4.
Fiscal sanctions.

If the department or the department’s authorized agent issues a notice of noncompliance with a correction order to an early childhood program or holder of a self-declaration, the department shall assess fiscal sanctions in accordance with a schedule of fiscal sanctions established by rules adopted by the department under subsection 2 of section 50-11.1-08. The department shall assess a fiscal sanction for each day the early childhood program or holder of a self-declaration remains in noncompliance after the allowable time period for the correction of violations ends and the sanction must continue as set forth in section 50-11.1-07.6 until the department receives notice indicating the violations are corrected. The fiscal sanction for a specific violation may not exceed one hundred dollars per day of noncompliance.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 15; 1985, ch. 526, § 11; 2005, ch. 418, § 12; 2009, ch. 422, § 16.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 16 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.5.
Accumulation of fiscal sanctions.

An early childhood program or holder of a self-declaration promptly shall notify the department or the department’s authorized agent in writing if a violation noted in a notice of noncompliance is corrected. Upon receipt of written notice by the department or the department’s authorized agent, the daily fiscal sanction assessed for the violation must stop accruing. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall reinspect or review the early childhood program or premises out of which the holder of the self-declaration is operating within three working days after receipt of the notification. If, upon reinspection or review, the department determines a violation has not been corrected, the department shall resume the daily assessment of fiscal sanction and shall add the amount of fiscal sanction which otherwise would have accrued during the period before resumption to the total assessment due from the program or holder of the self-declaration. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall notify the facility of the resumption by certified mail. Recovery of the resumed fiscal sanction must be stayed if the operator of the facility makes a written request for an administrative hearing in the manner provided in chapter 28-32, if written request for the hearing is made to the department within ten days of the notice of resumption.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 16; 1985, ch. 526, § 12; 2005, ch. 418, § 13; 2009, ch. 422, § 17; 2019, ch. 406, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.6.
Recovery of fiscal sanctions — Hearing.

Fiscal sanctions assessed pursuant to this chapter are payable fifteen days after receipt of the notice of noncompliance and at fifteen-day intervals thereafter, as the fiscal sanctions accrue. Recovery of an assessed fiscal sanction must be stayed if the program or holder of a self-declaration makes written request to the department for an administrative hearing within ten days after the early childhood program or the holder of the self-declaration receives the notice. If the appeal is unsuccessful or withdrawn, the daily assessment of fiscal sanctions must resume and the department shall add the amount of fiscal sanctions which otherwise would have accrued during the period prior to resumption to the total assessment due from the early childhood program or the holder of a self-declaration. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall notify the early childhood program or the holder of a self-declaration of the resumption by certified mail.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 17; 2009, ch. 422, § 18.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 18 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-07.7.
Disposition of fiscal sanctions.

Any fiscal sanction which is collected for any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted pursuant to this chapter must be paid into the state treasury for the general fund, after the costs of recovering the fiscal sanction are deducted therefrom.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 18; 1985, ch. 526, § 13.

50-11.1-07.8.
Suspension of license, self-declaration, or registration document — Assessment upon a report of child abuse or neglect — Notification.

The department may:

Suspend a license, self-declaration, or registration document at any time after the onset of a child abuse and neglect assessment alleging the owner or operator, the holder of a self-declaration, or the in-home provider:

Committed child abuse, including child sexual abuse, law enforcement has been involved, and continued operation is likely to jeopardize the health and safety of the children; or

Neglected a child, law enforcement has been involved, and continued operation is likely to jeopardize the health and safety of the children.

Suspend a license, self-declaration, or registration document upon a child abuse or neglect services required determination indicating a child has been abused or neglected by the owner or operator, the holder of a self-declaration, or the in-home provider, if continued operation is likely to jeopardize the health and safety of the children present.

Prohibit the presence of an accused owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, in-home provider, staff member, or adult or minor household member of the early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider from the early childhood premises when children are in child care, upon a report of child abuse or neglect at the premises of the early childhood program, holder of the self-declaration, or registration, or involving a staff member or adult or minor household member if continued operation or the presence of the accused individual is likely to jeopardize the health and safety of the children present.

Notwithstanding sections 50-11.1-07 and 50-25.1-11, the department:

Shall notify the parent of any child receiving early childhood services if that program’s license, self-declaration, or registration document is suspended.

Shall notify the owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider and shall notify the parent of any child receiving early childhood services if an owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, in-home provider, staff member, or adult or minor household member of the program providing care of the child is the subject of a child abuse and neglect assessment and the department determines:

The reported child abuse or neglect places children in the early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider at risk of abuse or neglect; and

If the reported child abuse or neglect occurred outside the care, supervision, or guidance of children in an early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider, there was an impact or is a potential impact on care, supervision, or guidance of the children in the early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider.

Shall notify the owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider and shall notify the parent of any child receiving early childhood services that an owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, in-home provider, staff member, or adult or minor household member is prohibited from the premises of the early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider under subsection 1.

Upon the conclusion and disposition of a child abuse and neglect assessment for which a determination services are required is found or for which the department issued a notice under subsection 2, the department shall provide notification of the disposition to the parent of each child who at the time of the determination is receiving early childhood services.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any action taken under this section may preclude an individual’s ability to operate pending an appeal.

Notwithstanding subsections 2 and 3:

The department may reconsider a suspension or prohibition.

If law enforcement requests a delay in notification, the department may delay notifying the owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider and delay notifying the parent of any child receiving early childhood services. To be valid, a law enforcement request for a notification delay must be provided to the department in writing within forty- eight hours of law enforcement receiving notification of an alleged criminal matter. A notification delay may last up to sixty days and, upon request of law enforcement, may be renewed.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 465, § 1; 2003, ch. 416, § 3; 2009, ch. 422, § 19; 2011, ch. 360, § 1; 2017, ch. 347, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 407, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 360, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 19 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-08.
Minimum standards — Rules — Inspection by a governmental unit.

The department may:

Establish reasonable minimum standards for the operation of early childhood programs, self-declaration, and the registration of in-home providers. In appropriate circumstances and upon good cause shown, specific minimum standards may be substituted by alternate, equivalent standards, approved by the department.

Take such action and make reasonable rules for the regulation of early childhood services necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and entitle the state to receive aid from the federal government.

Authorize a governmental unit to:

Inspect the premises for which a license, self-declaration, or registration document is applied or issued under this chapter; and

Certify to the department that the premises of a program, holder of self-declaration, or registration document meets the requirements of this chapter and the minimum standards prescribed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 8; 1979, ch. 509, § 7; 1981, ch. 491, § 7; 1985, ch. 526, § 14; 2009, ch. 422, § 20.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of private nursery school or day-care center, or employee thereof, for injury to child while attending facility, 58 A.L.R.4th 240.

Governmental liability for negligence in licensing, regulating, or supervising private day-care home in which child is injured, 68 A.L.R.4th 266.

50-11.1-09.
Revocation of license, self-declaration, or registration document.

The department may revoke the license, self-declaration, or registration document of any early childhood services provider upon proper showing of any of the following:

Any of the applicable conditions set forth in sections 50-11.1-04, 50-11.1-06, and section 50-11.1-17 as prerequisites for the issuance of the license, self-declaration, or registration document no longer exist.

The licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant is no longer in compliance with the minimum standards prescribed by the department.

The license, self-declaration, or registration document was issued upon fraudulent or untrue representation.

The licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant has violated any rules of the department.

The licensee, holder of a self-declaration, registrant, or a household member of a home out of which early childhood services are provided has been found guilty of, or pled guilty to, an offense the department determines has a direct bearing upon an individual’s ability to serve the public as a licensee, a holder of a self-declaration, or a registrant.

The licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant has been convicted of any offense and the department, acting pursuant to section 12.1-33-02.1, has determined that the individual has not been sufficiently rehabilitated.

The department may consider the early childhood services history of the licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant in determining revocation of a license, self-declaration, or in-home registration document.

The department shall notify, in writing, the parent of each child receiving early childhood services from the early childhood services provider that is the subject of the revocation notice.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 9; 1977, ch. 130, § 65; 1979, ch. 509, § 8; 1981, ch. 491, § 8; 1985, ch. 526, § 15; 2003, ch. 416, § 4; 2009, ch. 422, § 21.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 21 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see

§ 12.1-01-04.

50-11.1-10.
Denial or revocation of license, four-year old program approval, self-declaration, or registration document — Administrative hearing.

Before the department may deny any application for a license, four-year old program approval, self-declaration, or registration document under this chapter or before the department may revoke any license, four-year old program approval, self-declaration, or registration document, the department shall provide a written notice to the applicant, licensee, or holder of the four-year old program approval, self-declaration, or registration document of the reasons for the denial or revocation. The applicant, licensee, holder of a four-year old program approval or self-declaration, or registrant may request an administrative hearing appealing the denial or revocation in the manner provided in chapter 28-32. The applicant, licensee, holder of a self-declaration, or registrant shall make a request for hearing to the department within ten days after receipt of the notice of denial or revocation from the department.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 10; 2009, ch. 422, § 22; 2021, ch. 358, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-11.
Public agency purchase of early childhood services.

No agency of state or local government may purchase early childhood services, including care provided by or in the home of a relative, unless the early childhood program is licensed, registered, or approved by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 11; 1979, ch. 509, § 9; 1985, ch. 526, § 16; 2009, ch. 422, § 23.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 23 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-11.1.
Resource and referral services — Authority of department to make grants — Federal funds — Components.

The department may make grants to public and private nonprofit entities for the planning, establishment, expansion, improvement, or operation of early childhood services. Public or private entities may apply to the department for funding. Applicants shall apply for grants on forms provided by the department. Applications for grants using funds received by the state under subsection 2 must include assurances that federal requirements have been met.

The department shall submit an application annually to the United States secretary of health and human services for the purpose of obtaining the state’s allotment of funds authorized under chapter 8 of title VI of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 [42 U.S.C. 9871-9877] or under any subsequent federal law providing funding for child care and development programs.

Each entity providing early childhood resource and referral services shall identify all existing related early childhood services through information provided by all relevant public and private entities in the areas of service and must develop a resource file of these services which must be maintained and updated at least quarterly. The services must include early childhood services as identified in section 50-11.1-02.

Each entity providing early childhood resource and referral services shall establish a referral process that responds to parental needs for information, fully ensures the confidentiality of records and information as required under subsection 4 of section 50-11.1-07, affords parents maximum access to all referral information, and includes telephone referral available for no less than twenty hours per week and access via the internet. Each entity shall publicize its services through popular media sources, agencies, employers, and other appropriate methods.

All early childhood services resource and referral entities shall maintain documentation of the number of calls and contacts received and may collect and maintain the following information:

Ages of children served.

Time category of child care request for each child.

Special time category, such as nights, weekends, or swing shift.

The reason child care is needed.

Each early childhood services resource and referral entity shall have available, as an educational aid to parents, information on available parent, early childhood, and family education programs in the community and information on aspects of evaluating the quality and suitability of early childhood services, including licensing regulation, financial assistance availability, child abuse reporting procedures, and appropriate child development information.

A child care resource and referral entity shall provide technical assistance to existing and potential providers of all types of early childhood services and to employers. This assistance must include:

Information on all aspects of initiating new early childhood services, including licensing, zoning, program and budget development, and assistance in finding information from other sources;

Information and resources which help existing early childhood service providers to maximize their ability to serve the children and parents of their community;

Dissemination of information on current public issues affecting the local and statewide delivery of early childhood services;

Facilitation of communication between existing early childhood service providers and child-related services in the community served;

Recruitment of licensed providers; and

Options, and the benefits available to employers utilizing the various options, to expand child care services to employees.

Services prescribed by this section must be designed to maximize parental choice in the selection of early childhood services and to facilitate the maintenance and development of such services and resources.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 509, § 7; 2009, ch. 422, § 24.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 24 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-12.
Violation of chapter or rules — Injunction.

The department or the department’s authorized agent may seek injunctive action against an individual who provides early childhood services for which licensure is required, an early childhood program, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider in the district court through proceedings instituted by the attorney general on behalf of the department or by a state’s attorney on behalf of the authorized agent, if:

There is a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter; or

An early childhood program, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider, after notice and opportunity for hearing on the notice of noncompliance, on the resumption of the fiscal sanction, or after administrative hearing confirming and upholding the fiscal sanction does not pay a properly assessed fiscal sanction in accordance with section 50-11.1-07.6.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 12; 1981, ch. 491, § 9; 1985, ch. 526, § 17; 2009, ch. 422, § 25; 2017, ch. 348, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 25 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-13.
Penalty.

Any person, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or organization who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 13; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of private nursery school or day-care center, or employee thereof, for injury to child while attending facility, 58 A.L.R.4th 240.

50-11.1-13.1.
Penalty for provision of services — When applicable.

An individual who provides early childhood services to any child, other than a child who is a member of that individual’s household, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if:

Those services are provided after that individual is required to register as a sexual offender;

The department has denied that individual’s application for licensure, or self-declaration, or registration to provide early childhood services or has revoked that individual’s license, self-declaration, or registration document to provide early childhood services following a finding that services are required under chapter 50-25.1 and that finding has become final or has not been contested by that individual;

The individual allows another individual to be in the presence of the child receiving early childhood services if that other individual is required to register as a sexual offender or has had an application for licensure, self-declaration, or registration to provide early childhood services denied or revoked by the department following a finding that services are required under chapter 50-25.1 and that finding has become final or has not been contested by that other individual; or

The individual has been found guilty of, pled guilty to, or pled no contest to:

An offense described under chapter 12.1-16, 12.1-18, 12.1-27.2, or 12.1-41; section 12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-01.1, 12.1-17-02, 12.1-17-03, 12.1-17-04, 12.1-17-06, 12.1-17-07.1, 12.1-17-12, 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-04, 12.1-20-05, 12.1-20-05.1, 12.1-20-06, 12.1-20-07, 12.1-21-01, 12.1-22-01, 12.1-29-01, 12.1-29-02, 12.1-31-05, or 14-09-22; or subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 12.1-22-02.

An offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements as the elements required for conviction under any offense identified in paragraph 1.

An individual is not guilty of a class B misdemeanor under paragraphs b and c of subsection 1 if the department has made a determination that the individual is able to provide care that is free of abuse and neglect, in spite of a finding that services are required under chapter 50-25.1, which has become final or has not been contested.

An individual is not guilty of a class B misdemeanor under subdivision d of subsection 1 in the case of a misdemeanor offense described under sections 12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-03, 12.1-17-06, or 12.1-17-07.1, or an equivalent offense in another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements as required for conviction for offenses under sections 12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-03, 12.1-17-06, or 12.1-17-07.1, if five years have elapsed after final discharge or release from any term of probation, parole, or other form of community corrections or imprisonment, without subsequent conviction.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 466, § 1; 1997, ch. 409, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, § 26; 2015, ch. 339, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 369, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 26 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-14.
Workforce development.

The department may establish a statewide system to build systematic early childhood workforce voluntary training which may include distance learning formats, a professional registry, certificates, and specializations.

The department may charge reasonable fees for all training and development courses to offset costs. All fees collected under this section must be paid to the department or the department’s authorized agent and must be used to defray the cost of providing training and development courses to providers and staff members of early childhood services.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 418, § 2; 2021, ch. 12, § 28, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2007.

50-11.1-14.1.
Workforce development — Quality improvement — Technical assistance — Capacity building.

The department shall provide voluntary, progressive training opportunities leading to credentials and shall provide supports for the early childhood care and education workforce. The department shall implement a registry to track workforce participation.

The department shall implement a voluntary quality improvement process for licensed early childhood facilities. The department may provide a quality incentive payment and a higher reimbursement rate for child care assistance program payments to a participating early childhood facility. The department may provide technical assistance and support to an early childhood facility that applies for quality improvement and may provide financial incentives to an early childhood facility that sustains and increases program quality. The department may contract with a private, nonprofit agency to provide technical assistance under this subsection.

The department may provide supports and incentives to build child care capacity, including:

Technical assistance and support to individuals who want to establish a new program or expand existing capacity to include information on needs assessments, regulatory processes, facility design and furnishings, startup and operating budgets, staffing patterns, curriculum evaluation, and development of business plans.

Grants to programs with a viable business plan to support early childhood facility development and expansion in areas with a demonstrated need.

The department shall coordinate with other state agencies as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 425, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-15.
Early childhood services advisory board — Membership — Duties.

The early childhood services advisory board is composed of seven members appointed by the director of the department. The members of the board must include a broad-based geographically distributed membership. The term of office is four years expiring on July thirty-first with no more than two terms expiring in any one year. A vacancy occurring other than by reason of the expiration of a term must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, except that the appointment may be made for only the remainder of the unexpired term. The members are entitled to be paid for mileage and expenses incurred in attending meetings and in performance of their official duties in amounts provided by law for other state officers and employees. A member also is entitled to be reimbursed up to one hundred dollars per day for the expenses incurred by the member which relate to the hiring of a substitute early childhood services provider in order that the member may attend meetings and perform the member’s official duties.

The early childhood services advisory board shall:

Advise the department each time the department reviews early childhood services rules;

Upon the completion of the department’s review, with the assistance of the department, conduct an analysis of and make recommendations to the department regarding the department’s review of the early childhood services rules, however, final approval of any administrative rule changes must be completed through the administrative rulemaking process set forth in chapter 28-32; and

On an ongoing basis, make recommendations to the department regarding changes and revisions to the early childhood services rules. The recommendations, the goal of which is to streamline and improve the quality of the early childhood services process, must seek to balance the need for rules that ensure safe quality child care with the need to revise or eliminate rules that create unnecessary barriers for early childhood service providers.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 423, § 1; 2013, ch. 375, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013 became effective April 12, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013.

This section became effective April 22, 2009, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 423, S.L. 2009.